Washington statutes.
RCW 18.220.040

Director's authority.

The director has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086; and

(2) To administer licensing examinations approved by the board.

[ 2007 c 256 s 5; 2002 c 86 s 261; 2000 c 253 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Referral to electorate—2000 c 253 s 5: "The secretary of state shall submit section 5 of this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with RCW 43.135.090 (section 2, chapter 1, Laws of 2000, Initiative Measure No. 695). The suggested ballot title for this act is: "Shall the state department of licensing be authorized to levy fees on geologists sufficient to pay for their licensure?"" [ 2000 c 253 s 24.]

Reviser's note: Chapter 1, Laws of 2000 (Initiative Measure No. 695) was declared unconstitutional in its entirety by Amalgamated Transit v. State, 142 Wn.2d 183, 11 P.3d 762 (2000). Therefore 2000 c 253 s 5 was not referred to the electorate.